Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3751
Commission; officers; meetings; expenses.

The commission shall elect from its members a chairperson and such other officers as may be necessary. The commission shall meet at least once every three months and at such other times as called by the chairperson or by any three members of the commission. The members shall receive no compensation for their services, but appointed members shall receive reimbursement for expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 17;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 7.